Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2856
Temporary educational permit; practice pharmacy; conditions.

The holder of a temporary educational permit shall be entitled to practice pharmacy while serving in a supervised educational program or in an approved graduate pharmacy education program conducted by an accredited hospital or clinic in the State of Nebraska or by an accredited school or college of pharmacy in the State of Nebraska. The holder of a temporary educational permit shall not be qualified to engage in the practice of pharmacy outside of the assigned training program or outside the confines of the accredited hospital or clinic or the accredited school or college.

Laws 1978, LB 675, § 7;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.23;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 952.